North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-22 Estray Inspection [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8]

Effective Date.

The repeal of this chapter by section 8 of chapter 72, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

See now, generally, N.D.C.C. ch. 4.1-75, Estrays.

36-22-01.
Estray defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-02.
North Dakota stockmen’s association authority. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-03.
Rules — Fees for inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-04.
Collection of estray funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-05.
Estray fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 318, § 8.

36-22-06.
Payment to owners of estrays. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-07.
Publication of list of estrays. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-08.
Disposition of unclaimed receipts from sale of estrays. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-08.1.
North Dakota stockmen’s association fund — Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-22-09.
Audit of stockmen’s association. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.